Illinois, session 104th, SB1042.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Community Services Act is amended by 5changing Section 5 as follows: 6    (405 ILCS 30/5)  (from Ch. 91 1/2, par. 905)7    Sec. 5. This Act shall be known as the the "Community 8Services Act". 9(Source: P.A. 82-183.)